Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4130.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Animal control shelter" and "animal protection shelter" mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.331. (b) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural development. (c) "Fund" means the animal welfare fund created in section 3. (d) "Qualified veterinarian" means a person an individual licensed or otherwise authorized to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine under part 188 of article 15 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18801 to 333.18838, and who practices veterinary medicine in this state. (e) "State animal anticruelty laws" means the laws and standards provided for the adequate care of animals in chapter IX of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.49 to 750.70, 750.70a, including the provisions of section 50(8) 50(12) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4031 (request no. H00664'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.